Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1839.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2 of the act of November 29, 2006 (P.L.1471, No.165), known as the Sexual Assault Testing and Evidence Collection Act, is amended by adding a definition to read:Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Sexual abuse or exploitation." The term as defined under 23 Pa.C.S. § 6303 (relating to definitions).123456789101112131415161718192021 * * *Section 2. Section 3 heading and (a) introductory paragraph of the act are amended and subsection (a) is amended by adding a paragraph to read:Section 3. Sexual assault or exploitation reporting evidence collection program.(a) Establishment.--There is hereby established a Statewide sexual assault [evidence collection program to promote the health and safety of victims of sexual assault and to facilitate the prosecution of persons accused of sexual assault. This program shall be administered by the department.] or exploitation reporting program to promote the health and safety of minors, to facilitate the prosecution of persons willfully failing to report child abuse and to collect evidence sufficient to determine paternity DNA in the case of an investigation. Under this program the department shall:* * *(7) During its annual inspection of health care facilities, conduct a compliance review of records of all individuals who are younger than 14 years of age. Each inspection shall include a physical inspection of the records as to whether child protective services or a law enforcement agency was notified of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation of the child as required under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services). If the inspection reveals that child protective services or a law enforcement agency was not notified of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation, the department must notify child protective services or a law enforcement agency as required under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63. The results of the compliance review shall be published on the 20250HB1839PN2275 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 department's publicly accessible Internet website. The results shall omit all personal identifying information of the victim.* * *Section 3. The act is amended by adding a section to read:Section 4.1. Noncompliance.(a) Health care facilities.--(1) If, during a compliance review conducted under section 3(a)(7), the inspection reveals that child protective services or a law enforcement agency was not notified of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation of the child as required under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 (relating to child protective services), the following shall apply:(i) The parent or guardian of the victim who is under 17 years of age may bring a civil action against the health care facility.(ii) The department must refer the violation of 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63 to the Pennsylvania State Police and the appropriate medical licensing board for prosecution and investigation.(2) If, during a compliance review conducted under section 3(a)(7), the health care facility willfully fails to provide the records required for the review to the Department of Health, the health care facility shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.(b) Department of Health.--If, during a compliance review conducted under section 3(a)(7), the inspection reveals that child protective services or a law enforcement agency was not notified of suspected sexual abuse or exploitation and the inspector from the department willfully does not notify child 20250HB1839PN2275 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 protective services or a law enforcement agency as required under 23 Pa.C.S. Ch. 63, the inspector shall be guilty of a misdemeanor of the third degree.Section 4. The addition of the definition of "sexual abuse or exploitation" in section 2, section 3(a)(7) and section 4.1 of the act shall apply to annual inspections of health care facilities conducted on and after the effective date of this section.Section 5. This act shall take effect in 30 days.20250HB1839PN2275 - 4 - 123456789